Illinois, session 104th, HB2581.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Christopher 5James Act. 6    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 7adding Section 3-2-5.1 as follows: 8    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-5.1 new)9    Sec. 3-2-5.1. Department to establish a Safety Committee. 10    (a) The Department shall establish a Safety Committee 11comprised of bargaining unit and non-bargaining unit 12Department employees. At least 40% of committee members shall 13be bargaining unit employees. The Committee shall assess the 14Department's compliance with the Occupational Safety and 15Health Act and any other applicable workplace health and 16safety laws and shall make recommendations for improvements to 17processes and procedures to improve workplace safety. The 18Committee shall prepare an annual report on the Department's 19workplace safety efforts and plans for the future to further 20promote safety in the workplace.21    (b) The Director of Corrections shall appoint 60% of the 22Safety Committee, including the non-bargaining unit members   HB2581- 2 -LRB104 09485 RLC 19546 b1and up to 2 members of the International Union of Operating 2Engineers. The exclusive collective bargaining representative 3of the majority of the Department of Corrections employees 4shall appoint the remaining 40% of the Safety Committee. The 5Director of Corrections shall appoint the chairperson of the 6Committee. The appointed chairperson of the Committee shall 7have a professional background and training in an 8environmental health and safety field. The chairperson of the 9Safety Committee, or the chairperson's designee, may conduct a 10workplace safety inspection of any property, equipment, or 11workplace under the control or supervision of the Department 12at any time and shall conduct random unannounced inspections 13as often as deemed necessary.14    (c) The chairperson of the Safety Committee, or the 15chairperson's designee, may also investigate training 16practices for the use of equipment and may direct that 17alternative trainings be used. The Committee chairperson, or 18the chairperson's designee, may take any piece of equipment 19lacking industry standard safeguards out of service. The 20jurisdiction of the Safety Committee is strictly limited to 21the Occupational Safety and Health Act and any other 22applicable workplace health and safety laws.23    (d) The provisions of this Section are subject to 24appropriations.